Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-3446
Base limitation, defined.

Base limitation means the budget limitation rate applicable to school districts and the limitation on growth of restricted funds applicable to other political subdivisions prior to any increases in the rate as a result of special actions taken by a supermajority of any governing board or of any exception allowed by law. The base limitation is two and one-half percent until adjusted, except that the base limitation for school districts for school fiscal years 2017-18 and 2018-19 is one and one-half percent and for school fiscal year 2019-20 is two percent. The base limitation may be adjusted annually by the Legislature to reflect changes in the prices of services and products used by school districts and political subdivisions.

Laws 1998, LB 989, § 15;

Laws 2001, LB 365, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 540, § 3;

Laws 2009, LB545, § 2;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB5, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB235, § 1;

Laws 2013, LB407, § 1;

Laws 2017, LB409, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB675, § 1.